Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6105YH (3) 91 sc/ns H.F. 2180 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 35A.23 Service animal training 1 grant program ââ appropriation. 2 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 3 requires: 4 a. âAccredited organizationâ means a service animal training 5 organization that maintains a physical operating location in 6 this state and is accredited by the department pursuant to 7 rules adopted under subsection 6. 8 b. âEligible veteranâ means a resident of this state who 9 is a veteran, as defined in section 35.1, and who meets all 10 eligibility requirements established by the department for 11 participation in the service animal training grant program 12 established under this section. 13 c. âService animal training servicesâ means training, 14 placement, and related services provided by an accredited 15 organization to support an eligible veteranâs use of a service 16 animal that is individually trained to do work or perform tasks 17 for the benefit of the veteran. 18 2. A service animal training grant program is established 19 under the administration and control of the department to 20 award grants to eligible veterans to pay costs associated with 21 service animal training services. 22 3. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and each 23 fiscal year thereafter, there is appropriated from the general 24 fund of the state to the department one hundred thousand 25 dollars to award grants under the service animal training grant 26 program and to pay reasonable administrative costs of the 27 department associated with the program. 28 4. In administering the program, the department shall grant 29 up to five thousand dollars to each eligible veteran. An 30 eligible veteran shall not receive more than one grant under 31 this section during the veteranâs lifetime. 32 5. a. An application may be submitted by an eligible 33 veteran, on behalf of an eligible veteran by an accredited 34 organization with the consent of the eligible veteran, or in 35 -1- LSB 6105YH (3) 91 sc/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 2180 another manner provided by rule. 1 b. The department shall pay the grant directly to the 2 accredited organization identified in the approved application. 3 c. An accredited organization shall only use the moneys 4 awarded for the cost of service animal training services for 5 the eligible veteran. 6 d. The department may require an accredited organization 7 to certify the intended use of grant moneys and to provide 8 documentation demonstrating provision of the service animal 9 training services. 10 6. a. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 11 17A to administer this section, including but not limited to 12 rules related to all of the following: 13 (1) Criteria and procedures for accreditation and renewal 14 of accreditation of organizations, including minimum training 15 standards, consumer protections, and proof of a physical 16 operating location in this state. 17 (2) Eligibility requirements for veterans, application 18 procedures, prioritization for awarding grants if requests 19 exceed available funding, and procedures to prevent duplicate 20 grants. 21 (3) Recordkeeping, reporting, compliance monitoring, and 22 remedies for misuse of grant moneys, including recoupment when 23 appropriate. 24 b. The department may establish a fee for accredited 25 organizations to offset administrative costs. Fees collected 26 by the department under this paragraph shall be considered 27 appropriated receipts, as defined in section 8.2, and are 28 appropriated to the department for reasonable administrative 29 costs associated with the program. 30 7. The department shall coordinate with county commissions 31 of veteran affairs, county veteran service officers, and other 32 statewide veteran service organizations to conduct outreach and 33 assist eligible veterans with applications. 34 EXPLANATION 35 -2- LSB 6105YH (3) 91 sc/ns 2/ 3 H.F. 2180 The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 1 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 2 This bill establishes a veterans service animal training 3 grant program under the administration of the department of 4 veterans affairs (department) for the purpose of providing 5 service animal training services to eligible veterans. The 6 bill annually appropriates $100,000 from the general fund of 7 the state to the department to support the program. Under 8 the program, an eligible veteran may receive one grant in 9 the veteranâs lifetime for up to $5,000, which shall be paid 10 directly to the accredited organization providing the service 11 animal training services. The department may charge a fee to 12 accredited organizations, which shall be used for reasonable 13 administrative costs associated with the program. The bill 14 requires the department to adopt rules for implementing and 15 administering the program and to coordinate with veteran 16 service organizations to conduct outreach and assist eligible 17 veterans with applications. 18 -3- LSB 6105YH (3) 91 sc/ns 3/ 3